Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.45.020

Time limit for state official to solicit or accept contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked prior to the thirtieth day before the session.

(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW 43.07.370.

[ 2024 c 164 s 469. Prior: 2006 c 348 s 5; 2006 c 344 s 31; 2003 c 164 s 3; 1993 c 2 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.560, 42.17.710.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.